Massachusetts, session 194th, S1910.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 32 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 89E the
following section:-
Section 89F. If a sworn police officer of a police department of city or town, a sworn
police officer of the department of state police or a firefighter for a fire department of a city or
town, is killed, or dies from injuries received, or dies as a natural or proximate result of
undergoing a hazard peculiar to his or her employment, while in the performance of his or her
duty, their next of kin shall receive a flag of the commonwealth of Massachusetts and a flag of
the United States during the memorial service, the cost of which shall be borne by the
commonwealth.
of 1